Hawaii statutes.
§200-53 Sale or disposition of vessel.
When a vessel is abandoned, the owner of the vessel repair business or private
marina, or the owner's authorized representative; the designated representative
of the yacht club; or the owner of other private property, after one public
advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the State, may negotiate
a sale of the vessel or dispose of it; provided that the vessel shall not be
sold or disposed of less than five calendar days after the publication of the advertisement.
Upon the sale or disposal of the vessel under this part, the owner of the
vessel repair business or private marina, or the owner's authorized
representative; the designated representative of the yacht club; or the owner
of other private property, shall file an affidavit with the department stating
to whom the vessel was sold or, if the vessel was not sold, the manner in which
the vessel was disposed of pursuant to this part. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am
L 1999, c 232, §4; am L 2012, c 146, §10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next